West Virginia, session 2025, HB2505.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 21. PERSONAL INCOME TAX. §11-21-23. Cost of spaying or neutering a dog or cat tax credit. A credit against the tax imposed by the provisions of this article shall be allowed as follows:Cost of spaying or neutering a dog or cat, the credit is equal to 100 percent of the cost paid for spaying or neutering a dog or cat which may be taken in the year of the spaying or neutering a dog or cat:  Provided, That the taxpayer presents a receipt for the service from a licensed veterinarian.